Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies only to owners of properties on which structures or
uses were destroyed or interrupted by a wildfire that was identified in an executive  order
issued by the Governor in accordance with the Emergency Conflagration Act  under ORS
476.510 to 476.610 between August 1 and September 30, 2020. The local government may alter,
restore or replace such a use as provided in this section in lieu of another process.
(2) A property  owner may alter, restore or replace a nonresidential use without further
application with the local government if:
(a) The use was allowed outright as an accessory use, without regard to  whether the
primary use was destroyed or was or will be restored;
(b)(A) The use was subject to a land use process; and
(B) A permit, including a conditional permit, was issued for  the use notwithstanding any
expiration of the permit or any subsequent changes to the law or process; or
(c)(A) The use was established before a requirement that the use be  subject to a land use
process; and
(B) The replacement use conforms as nearly as practicable to  records of the use with the
county assessor, building permit information or other reliable records.
(3) The local government  shall approve an application to alter, restore or replace a
dwelling if the local government  determines that the evidence in the record establishes that:
(a) The former dwelling:
(A) Had intact exterior walls and roof structure;
(B) Had indoor plumbing consisting of a kitchen sink, toilet and bathing facilities  con-
nected to a sanitary waste disposal system;
(C) Had interior wiring for interior lights;
(D) Had a heating system; and
(E)(i) Was authorized by building permits or  other regulatory approval process by the
appropriate authority; or
(ii) Was assessed as a residential dwelling for  purposes of ad valorem taxation for the tax
year beginning July 1, 2001, and is not subject to unresolved  enforcement proceedings ques-
tioning the lawfulness of the dwelling; and
Enrolled House Bill 2289 (HB 2289-A) Page 1
(b) The proposed dwelling will:
(A) Not exceed the floor area of the destroyed dwelling by more than 10 percent;
(B) Be adequately served by water, sanitation and roads;
(C) Be located wholly or partially within the footprint  of the destroyed dwelling unless
the applicant chooses a different location within the same lot or parcel to comply with  local
flood regulations or to avoid a natural hazard area; and
(D) Comply with applicable building codes that were in effect on the later of:
(i) January 1, 2008; or
(ii) The date of the former dwelling’s construction.
(4) A local government may not  add conditions to the approval or siting of a dwelling
under subsection (3) of this section except as necessary to maintain participation  in the
National Flood Insurance Program under 42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.
(5) A local government may delegate the approval of  an application under subsection (3)
of this section to:
(a) A hearings officer, as defined in ORS 215.402 or 227.160;
(b) A planning commission, as described in ORS 215.020; or
(c) A building official, as defined in ORS 455.715.
(6) The findings of the local government or its designee  in approving an application under
subsection (3) of this  section is not a land use decision. The local government may not re-
quire an applicant give notice to  any nonparty. The findings and conclusions of the local
government are entitled to deference if there is any evidence to support the findings and are
subject to review only under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(7) If a local government  determines based on the evidence in the record that the use
legally existed, the local government may, through a  land use decision, approve an applica-
tion to alter, restore or replace a use  for which a land use application, building permit or
other regulatory approval was required but record of the approval is unavailable for:
(a) A dwelling  built after January 1, 2001, that complies with subsection (3)(a)(A) to (D)
and (b) of this section; or
(b) A nonresidential use or structure.
(8) An application under this section must be filed on or before September 30, 2025.
(9) An approval of an application under this section  expires only if the property owner
has not commenced development of the structure or use on or before December 30, 2030.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of  this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 454.605 to
454.755.
SECTION 4. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 454.655 (4), the Department of  Environmental
Quality shall issue a decision on a permit to repair or replace a subsurface sewage  disposal
system that serves a dwelling approved under section 2 of this  2021 Act without regard to
availability of a community or area-wide sewerage system.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 197.180,  the department shall issue a decision on a permit to
repair or replace a  subsurface sewage disposal system that serves a dwelling approved under
section 2 of this 2021 Act without regard to whether a local government has issued  a land
use compatibility statement for the dwelling.
(3) The department shall approve a permit to  repair or replace a subsurface sewage dis-
posal system that serves a dwelling approved under section 2 of this 2021 Act if:
(a) A subsurface sewage disposal system served the dwelling on July 30, 2020; and
(b) Issuance of the  permit and operation of the system would not result in pollution of
surface waters of the state or result  in pollution of ground water that would threaten public
health or other beneficial uses of ground water.
(4) This section does not apply to a permit for a  dwelling for which the owner received
financial assistance from the state or federal government for the repair or replacement  of
the subsurface sewage disposal system.
Enrolled House Bill 2289 (HB 2289-A) Page 2
(5) This section does not affect the authority of the department or  the Environmental
Quality Commission to grant a variance or an  exemption for a subsurface sewage disposal
system for a dwelling or other use.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House May 4, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2289 (HB 2289-A) Page 3